incubator/apertium-sme-smj.sme.dix
    <pardef n="Rohč/či__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čin</l>
          <r>či<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iin</l>
          <r>či<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čái</l>
          <r>či<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>či</l>
          <r>či<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>či<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>či<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>či<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iiguin</l>
          <r>či<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iide</l>
          <r>či<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>či<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iid</l>
          <r>či<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iid</l>
          <r>či<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iin</l>
          <r>či<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Davve-Su/opma__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>opman</l>
          <r>opma<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omain</l>
          <r>opma<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pmii</l>
          <r>opma<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>opma</l>
          <r>opma<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oma</l>
          <r>opma<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oma</l>
          <r>opma<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omas</l>
          <r>opma<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omaiguin</l>
          <r>opma<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omaide</l>
          <r>opma<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omat</l>
          <r>opma<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omaid</l>
          <r>opma<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omaid</l>
          <r>opma<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omain</l>
          <r>opma<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ráise/atnu__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atnun</l>
          <r>atnu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anuin</l>
          <r>atnu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tnui</l>
          <r>atnu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atnu</l>
          <r>atnu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anu</l>
          <r>atnu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anu</l>
          <r>atnu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anus</l>
          <r>atnu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anuiguin</l>
          <r>atnu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anuide</l>
          <r>atnu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anut</l>
          <r>atnu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anuid</l>
          <r>atnu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anuid</l>
          <r>atnu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anuin</l>
          <r>atnu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Iko/nen__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sin</l>
          <r>nen<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>siin</l>
          <r>nen<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sii</l>
          <r>nen<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nen</l>
          <r>nen<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sa</l>
          <r>nen<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sa</l>
          <r>nen<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sis</l>
          <r>nen<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>siiguin</l>
          <r>nen<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>siidda</l>
          <r>nen<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sat</l>
          <r>nen<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>siid</l>
          <r>nen<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>siid</l>
          <r>nen<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>siin</l>
          <r>nen<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Ahvonen"><i>Ahvo</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Álaheaieatnu"><i>Álaheaie</i><par n="Ráise/atnu__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Badje-Deatnu"><i>Badje-De</i><par n="Ráise/atnu__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Badjineatnu"><i>Badjine</i><par n="Ráise/atnu__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Auvinen"><i>Auvi</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Gaska-Suopma"><i>Gaska-Su</i><par n="Davve-Su/opma__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Haikonen"><i>Haiko</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Härkönen"><i>Härkö</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Hartikainen"><i>Hartikai</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Halinen"><i>Hali</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Heikurainen"><i>Heikurai</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Heikkonen"><i>Heikko</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Heiskanen"><i>Heiska</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Hessulainen"><i>Hessulai</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Hynynen"><i>Hyny</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Hiltunen"><i>Hiltu</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Huttunen"><i>Huttu</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Hyvärinen"><i>Hyväri</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Ipmeláhčči"><i>Ipmeláhč</i><par n="Rohč/či__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Ikonen"><i>Iko</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Inkinen"><i>Inki</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Jakonen"><i>Jako</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Karttunen"><i>Karttu</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Kauppinen"><i>Kauppi</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Kasurinen"><i>Kasuri</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Juntunen"><i>Juntu</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Kiiskinen"><i>Kiiski</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Kähkönen"><i>Kähkö</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Juleveatnu"><i>Juleve</i><par n="Ráise/atnu__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Jokinen"><i>Joki</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Kaikkonen"><i>Kaikko</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Kallinen"><i>Kalli</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Kettinen"><i>Ketti</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Kuhmunen"><i>Kuhmu</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Laitinen"><i>Laiti</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Korhonen"><i>Korho</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Kumpulainen"><i>Kumpulai</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Lotvonen"><i>Lotvo</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Lipponen"><i>Lippo</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Lulli-Suopma"><i>Lulli-Su</i><par n="Davve-Su/opma__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Mátta-Suopma"><i>Mátta-Su</i><par n="Davve-Su/opma__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Malinen"><i>Mali</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Matiskainen"><i>Matiskai</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Meriläinen"><i>Meriläi</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Mietinen"><i>Mieti</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Nikkinen"><i>Nikki</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Niskanen"><i>Niska</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Nuorta-Suopma"><i>Nuorta-Su</i><par n="Davve-Su/opma__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Oarje-Deatnu"><i>Oarje-De</i><par n="Ráise/atnu__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Pöyhönen"><i>Pöyhö</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Pasanen"><i>Pasa</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Paakkanen"><i>Paakka</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Peuranen"><i>Peura</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Rahkonen"><i>Rahko</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Ráiseatnu"><i>Ráise</i><par n="Ráise/atnu__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Räisänen"><i>Räisä</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Rikkonen"><i>Rikko</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Rohčči"><i>Rohč</i><par n="Rohč/či__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Salminen"><i>Salmi</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Santonen"><i>Santo</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Siitonen"><i>Siito</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Solbakken-Härkönen"><i>Solbakken-Härkö</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Tynkkynen"><i>Tynkky</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Tirkkonen"><i>Tirkko</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Timonen"><i>Timo</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Tauriainen"><i>Tauriai</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Vanhanen"><i>Vanha</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Vuolle-Deatnu"><i>Vuolle-De</i><par n="Ráise/atnu__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Virtanen"><i>Virta</i><par n="Iko/nen__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Yanaeatnu"><i>Yanae</i><par n="Ráise/atnu__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Davve-Suopma"><i>Davve-Su</i><par n="Davve-Su/opma__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Davvi-Suopma"><i>Davvi-Su</i><par n="Davve-Su/opma__N_Prop"/></e>
